DI-150

DIAGNOSTICS - SUBFUELTANKSYSTEM

DI3MF-02

DTC 23 Both Fuel Pump Simultaneous Operation
Malfunction (*)

*: Fuel Tank Changeover Switch OFF

CIRCU

IT DESCRIPTION

Refer to DTC 11 (Main Fuel Pump Circuit Malfunction) on page DI-138.

(b) Voltage of FPM terminal is high
(c) Voltage of FPMR terminal is high

DTC No. DTC Detecting ltem Trouble Area
Conditions (a), (b) and (c) continue:
(a) Fuel tank changeover switch OFF  Shortin sub fuel tank forcing driving relay circuit
23 (Voltage of FPMS terminal is low) « Sub fueltank forcing driving relay

« Shortin sub fuel pump circuit (+B short)

WIRING DIAGRAM
Refer to DTC 11 (Main Fuel Pump Circuit Malfunction) on page DI-138.

INSPECTION PROCEDURE

1

Checkvoltage between terminal FPMR of engine ECU connector and body
ground (See page DI-146, step 2).
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Repair and replace harness and connector.

Check sub fuel tank forcing driving relay (See page FI-58).
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place sub fueltankforcingdrivingrelay.
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ground.

3 | Check voltage between terminal FPR2 of engine ECU connector and body

\ Switch is OFF

(// ON Fuel Tank Changeover
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PREPARATION:
(@ Remove the glove compartment door.
(b)  Turn the ignition switch ON.
(¢) Fuel tank changeover switch is OFF.
CHECK:
Measure voltage between terminal FPR2 of engine ECU con-
nectorand body ground, andturn the ignition switch ON after
4 seconds.
OK:
Voltage:9 -14V

NG> Go to step 4.

Check and repair harness and connector between sub fuel pump and sub fuel tank forcing driv-
ing relay (+B short circuit) (See page IN-19).

4 | Check for short in harness and connector between sub fuel tank forcing driving
relay and engine ECU (See page IN-19).

@

NG> Repair or replace.

Check and replace engine ECU
(See page IN-19).
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